Hawaii statutes.
§101-4 Right of eminent domain granted to
public utilities and others. The right and power of eminent domain is
hereby granted to every person, operating a public utility, and engaged in the
transportation of passengers or freight or any commodity by rail or bus, or by
any other means, or the conveyance or transmission of telephone messages, or
the production, conveyance, transmission, delivery, or furnishing of
electricity, power, water, gas, or oil, within the State, as well as to
corporations designated in section 101-41. The right and power shall be
exercised only in compliance with, and under, the conditions and procedures set
forth in this part. [L 1896, c 45, §6; RL 1925, §809; RL 1935, §51; RL 1945,
§302; am L 1951, c 12, §1(c); RL 1955, §8-4; HRS §101-4]

Case Notes

Cited: 20 H. 365, 367.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next